Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.300

Metal tire.

"Metal tire" includes every tire, the bearing surface of which in contact with the highway is wholly or partly of metal or other hard, nonresilient material.

[ 1961 c 12 s 46.04.300. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 31; prior: (i) 1943 c 153 s 1, part; 1937 c 188 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6312-1, part. (ii) 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part; 1929 c 180 s 1, part; 1927 c 309 s 2, part; RRS s 6362-2, part.]